Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1507
Commission; meat processors; contracts
authorized; duties.

The commission may enlist as many meat processors as available
to participate in the program and shall enter into contracts with meat processors
as described in section 37-1508 subject to available funding in the Hunters
Helping the Hungry Cash Fund. The commission shall provide forms for donation
of deer by hunters and posters for meat processors to advertise their participation.
The commission shall provide informational and promotional materials to meat
processors regarding the program.

Laws 2012, LB928, § 11.